Massachusetts, session 194th, H784.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 19D of the Massachusetts General Laws as appearing in the 2022 official edition
is hereby amended by inserting the following language at the end of Section 7:
The Executive Office of Elder Affairs shall implement an informal dispute resolution
process that allows residences to contest findings issued for which corrective action is
determined by the agency to be required. The agency shall offer an opportunity, at a residence’s
request, to dispute and appeal the finding and such request must be submitted in writing within
10 days of receipt of the agency’s issued findings. The agency shall establish a 10-member
committee (5 voting members and 5 alternates) to review appeals. The Committee shall include a
representative from Massachusetts Senior Care Association, LeadingAge of Massachusetts,
MassALA, the Commonwealth’s Ombudsman Program, defined in Chapter 19A and EOEA,
who will serve as committee chairperson. Based upon its review of submitted materials, the
committee may recommend that the finding be retained or deleted. At the committee meeting, all
of 2

members (voting members and alternates) may participate in the discussion. Only voting
members may vote. If any member has a conflict of interest, he/she is to declare that conflict and
will not participate in the discussion. Recommendations will be made based on committee
consensus. If a consensus cannot be reached, a recommendation will be made by a majority vote.
The Executive Office of Elder Affairs will maintain the authority to accept or deny the
committee’s recommendation and notify the assisted living residence in writing of such
determination.
of 2